Nevada, session 2025Special36, AB5.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Sections 1 to 20, inclusive, of this act may be cited
as the Nevada Studio Infrastructure Jobs and Workforce Training
Act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) The Las Vegas Metropolitan Area is the largest metropolitan
area in this State and has a site available to be developed to create
large-scale facilities for the location of companies that produce
motion pictures, television programs and other qualified productions
in this State. The establishment of such a studio campus will create
jobs in Nevada’s creative industries and diversify the economy of
this State.
(b) The Las Vegas Metropolitan Area possesses unique
geographic, economic and resource advantages that make it
especially suitable for a project of this magnitude. Because of these
unique local conditions, it is necessary to enact a law of local and
special application to promote and secure the benefits of a large-
scale film and media production development in Southern Nevada
for the benefit of the entire State.
(c) Because of these special characteristics and circumstances in
Southern Nevada, a general law cannot be made applicable to
achieve the purposes of this Act and a law of local and special
application is necessary to promote and secure the advantages of the
local and special characteristics and circumstances within the Las
Vegas Metropolitan Area.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 5 –
2. The Legislature further finds and declares that the content
production industry has presented an ambitious and visionary plan
for all of Southern Nevada, which leverages the region’s unique
geographic assets, economic capabilities and infrastructural
advantages. The industry’s vision will promote the generation of
thousands of high-quality, high-paying jobs, billions of dollars in
incremental capital investments and billions more in new economic
output and ongoing spending. This plan transcends the development
of a mere studio complex, proposing instead a dynamic production
campus that is intended to serve as the nucleus for a robust,
sustainable industrial cluster. The Legislature recognizes that
realizing this vision depends fundamentally upon a collaborative
public-private partnership, wherein the State’s commitment,
provided through transferable tax credits, creates leverage that
significantly multiplies the benefits accruing to this State. In
entering this partnership, the Legislature affirms its clear and
unwavering expectation that if the industry benefits from the State’s
contribution of transferable tax credits, the industry’s promises will
be fulfilled, the outcomes articulated by the industry will be met or
exceeded, and the anticipated economic, fiscal and social benefits
driven by the industry will be fully realized.
3. The Legislature further finds and declares that the enactment
of this Act will achieve a bona fide public social and economic
purpose. The public investment made through the film infrastructure
transferable tax credits is intended to yield substantial benefits in
employment, workforce development and economic growth, and the
overall economic benefits expected to accrue from incremental
investment and the ongoing operations of the project will exceed
any adverse effect on public revenues from those tax incentives.
This Act, therefore, serves the public interest by fostering significant
new private investment, creating enduring jobs and educational
opportunities, and positioning Nevada as a leader in the content
creation industry while ensuring that the long-term gains to the
economy more than outweigh the State’s investment in the project.
Sec. 3. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this Act,
to:
1. Promote the diversification of the economy of this State by
cultivating a thriving hub for content creation and production in
Nevada, which will establish Nevada as a nationally recognized
center for film, television and digital media production, thereby
broadening Nevada’s economic base beyond its traditional
industries and enhancing the State’s prominence in the creative
economy.
2. Provide an anchor for a new creative sector in Southern
Nevada through partnerships with global film and media companies
-
*AB5_R2*

– 6 –
to develop and operate facilities for the production of film,
television and digital media productions and the involvement of
studio partners as anchor tenants to bring world-class expertise,
innovative technologies and global market access that will
accelerate the growth of a robust content creation industry in
Southern Nevada.
3. Support and promote workforce development in this State by
establishing and supporting education and vocational training
programs to prepare Nevada’s workforce for high-wage careers in
film, television and digital media production, equip Nevada’s
residents with in-demand skills and create pathways into the
industry, thereby generating thousands of new jobs for Nevadans
and building a skilled talent pool that sustains the State’s creative
sector for the long term.
Sec. 4. As used in sections 1 to 20, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in NRS 360.7582 and 360.7586, as amended by sections 24 and 25
of this act, have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections,
and the words and terms defined in sections 5 to 9, inclusive, of this
act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. “Capital investment” means all costs and expenses
incurred by the participants in the Project in connection with the
acquisition of the land for the Project and the acquisition,
construction, installation and equipping of the facilities, buildings,
structures and other infrastructure at the Project for the production
of qualified productions at the Project.
Sec. 6. “Lead participant” means the person designated by the
participants in the Project as the lead participant for the Project.
Sec. 7. “Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio” means a
facility:
1. To be located by December 31, 2029, at a site owned by
Nevada Partners, Inc., or its successor organization, or if Nevada
Partners, Inc. ceases to exist and has no successor organization, to
be located by December 31, 2030, at a site approved by the
Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board created by section 8
of the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Infrastructure
Improvement Act; and
2. At which vocational training and education is to be provided
for the development of a trained workforce for the production in this
State of qualified productions that are film and television
productions.
Sec. 8. “Office” means the Office of Economic Development
within the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 9. “Summerlin Production Studios Project” or “Project”
means a project for the construction of a development consisting of
-
*AB5_R2*

– 7 –
facilities, buildings, structures and other infrastructure for the
production of qualified productions at the site of real property
burdened by the following development agreements and owned by
the master developer under such development agreements or such
master developer’s affiliated entities:
1. Development agreement between Clark County and Howard
Hughes Properties, Limited Partnership dated February 7, 1996, as
amended, and recorded on September 4, 1996, in Book 960904 as
Instrument No. 01725 and re-recorded on September 10, 1996, in
Book 960910 as Instrument No. 01379 in the official records of the
Clark County, Nevada Recorder’s Office.
2. Development agreement between the City of Las Vegas and
Howard Hughes Properties, Limited Partnership, recorded on
November 21, 1997, in Book 971121 as Instrument No. 00839, as
amended, in the official records of the Clark County, Nevada
Recorder’s Office.
Sec. 10. 1. Not later than 120 days after the effective date of
this act, the Office shall enter into a development agreement with
the lead participant of the Summerlin Production Studios Project,
unless the Office agrees to extend this period by not more than 60
days. The development agreement entered into pursuant to this
section:
(a) Must require the Project to:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, not
later than:
(I) December 31, 2028, make a new capital investment in
this State, excluding any hotel and any business required to hold a
license issued pursuant to chapter 463 of NRS, of at least
$400,000,000.
(II) June 30, 2030, make an aggregate new capital
investment in this State, of at least $900,000,000. For the purposes
of determining the amount of new capital investment pursuant to
this sub-subparagraph, any new capital investment by a third party
who purchases property or enters into a ground lease for property
within the site of the Project must be credited toward meeting the
requirement of this sub-subparagraph. The Office shall credit toward
meeting the requirement of this sub-subparagraph 50 percent of the
new capital investment made at the Downtown Summerlin site
during the period beginning on the date of the execution of the
development agreement and ending on June 30, 2030, if the Board
of Economic Development determines that the new capital
investment is consistent with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053
-
*AB5_R2*

– 8 –
and the intent of the Legislature as expressed in sections 2 and 3 of
this act.
(III) June 30, 2033, make an aggregate new capital
investment in this State of at least $1,400,000,000. For the purposes
of determining the amount of new capital investment pursuant to
this sub-subparagraph, any new capital investment by a third party
who purchases property or enters into a ground lease for property
within the site of the Project must be credited toward meeting the
requirement of this sub-subparagraph. The Office shall credit toward
meeting the requirement of this sub-subparagraph 50 percent of the
new capital investment made at the Downtown Summerlin site
during the period beginning on the date of the execution of the
development agreement and ending on June 30, 2033, if the Board
of Economic Development determines that the new capital
investment is consistent with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053
and the intent of the Legislature as expressed in sections 2 and 3 of
this act.
(IV) June 30, 2039, make an aggregate new capital
investment in this State of at least $1,800,000,000. For the purposes
of determining the amount of new capital investment pursuant to
this sub-subparagraph, any new capital investment by a third party
who purchases property or enters into a ground lease for property
within the site of the Project must be credited toward meeting the
requirement of this sub-subparagraph. The Office shall credit toward
meeting the requirement of this sub-subparagraph 50 percent of the
new capital investment made at the Downtown Summerlin site
during the period beginning on the date of the execution of the
development agreement and ending on June 30, 2039, if the Board
of Economic Development determines that the new capital
investment is consistent with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053
and the finding and intent of the Legislature as expressed in sections
2 and 3 of this act.
(2) Not later than December 31, 2028, contribute at least
$8,000,000 to Nevada Partners, Inc. to support the construction and
operation of the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio and to
the maximum extent practicable, collaborate with Nevada Partners,
Inc. to ensure that not later than December 31, 2030, construction of
the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio has been completed
and the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio is operational.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 9 –
(3) If the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio is not
completed and operational before January 1, 2031, ensure that an
equivalent facility is constructed and operational before that date.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (5) and
subsection 6, guarantee that for the period beginning on:
(I) July 1, 2029, and ending on June 30, 2035, the Project
will generate, for each period consisting of 2 fiscal years during that
time, not less than $600,000,000 of direct production expenditures.
(II) July 1, 2035, and ending on June 30, 2044, the Project
will generate, for each period consisting of 3 fiscal years during that
time, not less than $900,000,000 of direct production expenditures.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
require that if, during any period described in subparagraph (4), the
amount of direct production expenditures exceeds the amount
required by subparagraph (4) for that period, the excess amount
must be carried forward and used to offset any shortage in satisfying
any requirement set forth in subparagraph (4) in any subsequent
period. The total amount of excess direct production expenditures
for a period described in subparagraph (4) that may be used to offset
a shortfall in the amount of direct production expenditures required
for any subsequent period described in subparagraph (4) cannot
exceed $200,000,000.
(6) Not later than 5 years after the Office and the lead
participant execute the development agreement, make a contribution
of at least $6,000,000 for the construction, in conjunction with
Chicanos Por La Causa, of a center to be located on the east side of
the City of Las Vegas, as determined by agreement of the Office and
the lead participant, to support education and workforce training
related to the production of qualified productions that are film or
television productions and for child care for participants in such
education and workforce training programs.
(7) If the center described in subparagraph (6) is not
completed and operational before January 1, 2031, ensure that an
equivalent facility is constructed and operational before that date.
(8) Prohibit any establishment operating any gaming or
gambling, gaming device, sports pool, race book or any game or
gambling game as those terms are defined and licensed pursuant to
chapter 463 of NRS for any portion of the Project during the term of
the development agreement, except for any facilities, buildings or
structures that house a business that:
(I) Manufactures, distributes or sells gaming devices,
games or associated equipment as defined or described pursuant to
chapter 463 of NRS or the regulations adopted by the Nevada
Gaming Commission; or
-
*AB5_R2*

– 10 –
(II) Provides cloud computing services, information
technology or acts as a service provider or hosting center as defined
or described in chapter 463 of NRS or the regulations adopted by
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(9) Provide written notice to the Office within 30 days after
the applicable deadline for completing a requirement set forth in
subparagraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, which must state whether the
requirement has been met. Upon receipt of the written notice,
the Office shall make a final determination, in writing, of whether
the requirement has been met and provide that determination to the
lead participant of the Project. If the Office determines that the
requirement has been met, the Office shall establish the date on
which the requirement was met.
(b) Must establish the minimum amount of square feet of
building space at the Project to be used for the various components
of the production of qualified productions.
(c) Must establish the minimum number of acres of real property
that will be a part of the Project.
(d) May include such other provisions, not inconsistent with
law, concerning the development of the Project and the issuance of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to sections 4 to
20, inclusive, of this act, as agreed to by the Office and the lead
participant.
2. As the Executive Director of the Office deems necessary or
advisable, the Executive Director may modify any requirement for
new capital investment set forth in subparagraph (1) of paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 by extending the date by which any new capital
investment set forth in those provisions must be made.
3. If the Office determines that the Project has not met a
requirement for capital investment included in the development
agreement pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the Office must document its determination in writing,
notify the lead participant, in writing, of its determination and
impose a penalty on the Project in an amount not to exceed the
amount of the deficiency. The Project may cure the deficiency by
making the required capital investment in the element of the Project
for which the requirement for capital investment was not met not
later than 2 years after the end of the period for which the
requirement for capital investment was not met, in an amount
necessary to satisfy the requirement for capital investment in an
element of the Project that was not met. If the deficiency is:
(a) Cured within the cure period, 100 percent of the amount of
the penalty must be discharged.
(b) Not cured within that cure period, the Office must record a
lien on any land within the Project that is undeveloped or has not
-
*AB5_R2*

– 11 –
been developed in accordance with the findings and intent of the
Legislature as expressed in sections 2 and 3 of this act, to secure
payment of such penalty, subject to the limitations set forth in
subsection 4. Any penalty, and the lien securing the payment of such
penalty, must be discharged as follows:
(1) If the requirement for capital investment which was not
met is satisfied not later than 1 year after the expiration of the cure
period, 90 percent of the amount of the penalty, and the lien
securing the payment of the penalty, must be discharged.
(2) If the requirement for capital investment which was not
met is satisfied more than 1 year, but not later than 2 years, after the
expiration of the cure period, 70 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
(3) If the requirement for capital investment which was not
met is satisfied more than 2 years, but not later than 3 years, after
the expiration of the cure period, 50 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
(4) If the requirement for capital investment which was not
met is satisfied more than 3 years, but not later than 4 years, after
the expiration of the cure period, 30 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
(5) If the requirement for capital investment which was not
met is satisfied more than 4 years, but not later than 5 years, after
the expiration of the cure period, 10 percent of the amount of the
penalty, and the lien securing the payment of the penalty, must be
discharged.
4. Only one lien may by recorded pursuant to subsection 3 and
such a lien:
(a) Must not, at any time, exceed the lesser of the amount of the
deficiency or 100 percent of the appraised value of the remaining
land within the Project that is undeveloped or has not been
developed in accordance with the findings and intent of the
Legislature as expressed in sections 2 and 3 of this act.
(b) May not be recorded on any completed portion of the
Project.
(c) May be modified, replaced or reissued to secure payment of
the most current amount of any penalty imposed pursuant to
subsection 3 but any such lien is subject to the limitations of this
subsection.
5. If the Office determines that the amount of direct production
expenditures is less than $150,000,000 in any fiscal year
commencing on or after July 1, 2029, and before July 1, 2044, the
-
*AB5_R2*

– 12 –
Office must notify the Project, in writing, of its determination and
impose a penalty on the Project in an amount equal to the lesser of
$10,000,000 or the amount determined by:
(a) Calculating 50 percent of the sum of the film infrastructure
transferable tax credits authorized for approval pursuant to section
15 of this act for that fiscal year and the immediately preceding
fiscal year;
(b) Calculating a percentage by dividing the difference between
the $150,000,000 and the actual amount, as determined by the
Office, of direct production expenditures, by $150,000,000; and
(c) Multiplying the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph
(b) by the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (a).
 Any penalty paid pursuant to this subsection must be applied to
reduce the amount of any penalty imposed pursuant to subsection 6.
6. If the Office determines that the Project has not met a
requirement for direct production expenditures included in the
development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (4) of paragraph
(a) of subsection 1, the Project must pay to the Office a penalty in an
amount determined as follows:
(a) If the actual amount of direct production expenditures is
more than 2 percent and not more than 5 percent less than the
applicable requirement for direct production expenditures included
in the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$2,000,000.
(b) If the actual amount of direct production expenditures is
more than 5 percent and not more than 10 percent less than the
applicable requirement for direct production expenditures included
in the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$5,000,000.
(c) If the actual amount of direct production expenditures is
more than 10 percent and not more than 20 percent less than the
applicable requirement for direct production expenditures included
in the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$10,000,000.
(d) If the actual amount of direct production expenditures is
more than 20 percent and not more than 30 percent less than the
applicable requirement for direct production expenditures included
in the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$20,000,000.
(e) If the actual amount of direct production expenditures is
more than 30 percent and not more than 40 percent less than the
-
*AB5_R2*

– 13 –
applicable requirement for direct production expenditures included
in the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$30,000,000.
(f) If the actual amount of direct production expenditures is
more than 40 percent and not more than 50 percent less than the
applicable requirement for direct production expenditures included
in the development agreement pursuant to subparagraph (4) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a penalty in the amount of
$40,000,000.
(g) If the actual amount of direct production expenditures is
more than 50 percent less than the applicable requirement for direct
production expenditures included in the development agreement
pursuant to subparagraph (4) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, a
penalty in the amount of $50,000,000.
7. The Office may reduce, or waive, any penalty imposed
pursuant to subsections 3 to 6, inclusive, if, upon written request of
the lead participant, the Office determines that the failure to meet a
requirement for which a penalty may be imposed was caused by
extraordinary circumstances beyond the control of the Project and
reasonable, documented and good-faith efforts were made to satisfy
the requirement. For the purposes of this subsection, “extraordinary
circumstances”:
(a) Means natural disasters, labor strikes, significant disruptions
in material supply chains, substantial economic or geopolitical
shocks, government-mandated closures, delays in obtaining any
approval of a governmental entity needed for the Project that are not
caused by the Project or other events in the nature of force majeure
that materially impair the ability to carry out development and
construction activities.
(b) Does not include ordinary market fluctuations, internal
project scheduling decisions or changes in business strategy.
8. Before taking any action or declining any request for an
action authorized by subsection 7, the Executive Director of the
Office shall:
(a) Consider any documentation submitted by the production
company related to the action under consideration; and
(b) Make the following determinations in writing:
(1) That good cause exists to take such action; and
(2) That the action is reasonable based on the circumstances
of the underlying incident on which the reduction or withholding of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits authorized pursuant to
subsection 4 is based.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 14 –
9. Any penalty paid to the Office pursuant to subsections 3 to
6, inclusive, must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to
the State General Fund.
10. The Office shall not approve any abatement, partial
abatement or exemption from taxes, or any other incentive for
economic development, other than film infrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to sections 4 to 20, inclusive, of this act or
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.758
to 360.7598, inclusive, for the Summerlin Production Studios
Project if the Project has entered into a development agreement with
the Office pursuant to this section.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Direct production expenditures” means expenditures in this
State:
(1) By a production company that is affiliated with the lead
participant and is producing, in whole or in part, a qualified
production at the Project;
(2) That are direct expenditures on a qualified production
that is produced, in whole or in part, at the Project; and
(3) That meet the criteria to be a qualified direct production
expenditure pursuant to subsection 1 of section 12 of this act,
regardless of whether the production company applies for or
receives film transferable tax credits for the qualified production.
(b) “Hotel” means a building occupied or intended to be
occupied for compensation, as the temporary residence for transient
guests, primarily persons who have residence elsewhere. A hotel has
an interior hall and lobby with access to each room from the interior
hall or lobby.
Sec. 11. 1. A production company that is located at the
Summerlin Production Studios Project and that produces, in whole
or in part, a qualified production at the Project may, on or after
December 1, 2026, apply to the Office for a certificate of eligibility
for film infrastructure transferable tax credits for any qualified direct
production expenditures. The film infrastructure transferable tax
credits may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapter 363A or 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fee imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. Except as otherwise provided in section 15 of this act, the
Office shall approve an application for a certificate of eligibility for
film infrastructure transferable tax credits if the Office finds that the
production company is producing the qualified production, in whole
-
*AB5_R2*

– 15 –
or in part, at the Summerlin Production Studios Project and the
production company qualifies for the film infrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to subsection 3. If the Office approves the
application, the Office shall:
(a) Calculate the estimated amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits that may be issued for the qualified
production pursuant to sections 12 to 15, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Immediately forward a copy of the certificate of eligibility
which identifies the estimated amount of tax credits to:
(1) The applicant;
(2) The lead participant;
(3) The Department of Taxation; and
(4) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
3. To be eligible for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section, the production company must:
(a) Before the beginning of principal photography, submit to the
Office an application for a certificate of eligibility that meets the
requirements of subsection 4;
(b) Submit to the Office with the application for a certificate of
eligibility:
(1) Written documentation from the lead participant that
affirms that the production company is located at the Summerlin
Production Studios Project and is producing, in whole or in part, a
qualified production at the Project;
(2) Proof that 70 percent or more of the funding for the
qualified production has been obtained; and
(3) Proof that:
(I) At least 50 percent of the total principal photography
days of the qualified production will take place in this State; or
(II) The qualified production will incur qualified direct
production expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000;
(c) Satisfy the applicable requirement for the employment of
Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of the qualified
production, as set forth in section 13 of this act;
(d) Provide to the Office:
(1) With the application for a certificate of eligibility, proof
that the applicant has in place a workforce plan for the qualified
production that outlines specific goals for:
(I) Hiring a workforce that reflects the diversity of this
State, with not less than 30 percent of the persons hired for qualified
productions being members of a traditionally underrepresented
group;
(II) Adopting nondiscriminatory policies and practices to
ensure that the qualified production does not discriminate in
employment, contracting or any other term or condition of
-
*AB5_R2*

– 16 –
participation in the qualified production, against any protected class
of individuals pursuant to state or federal law;
(III) Using vendors that are minority-owned business
enterprises or woman-owned business enterprises; and
(IV) Achieving the requirements set forth in subsection 2
of section 13 of this act; and
(2) Not later than 365 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production, unless the Office agrees to
extend this period by not more than 180 days, a final assessment of
the workforce plan that includes documentation on whether the
production met or made good faith efforts to achieve the goals set
forth in the workforce plan;
(e) Not later than 365 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production or, if any direct production
expenditures for postproduction will be incurred in this State, not
later than 365 days after the completion of postproduction, unless
the Office agrees to extend this period by not more than 180 days,
provide the Office with an audit of the qualified production that
includes:
(1) An itemized report of qualified direct production
expenditures which:
(I) Shows that the qualified production incurred qualified
direct production expenditures of $500,000 or more;
(II) If the production company complied with the
requirement of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) by providing to
the Office with the application for a certificate of eligibility proof
that the qualified production would incur qualified direct production
expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000, shows that the
qualified production incurred qualified direct production
expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000; and
(III) Is certified by an independent certified public
accountant in this State who is approved by the Office;
(2) A list of each contractor, vendor, personal service
corporation or loan-out company or other business engaged by the
production company to provide goods or perform services in an
aggregate amount of at least $10,000 or more in this State in
connection with the qualified production and the amount paid to
each contractor, vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out
company or other business for such goods or services; and
(3) Proof that the production company secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production was produced;
(f) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (e);
(g) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company to include:
-
*AB5_R2*

– 17 –
(1) In the end screen credits of the qualified production, a
logo of this State provided by the Office which indicates that the
qualified production was filmed or otherwise produced in Nevada;
or
(2) If the qualified production does not have end screen
credits, another acknowledgment in the final version of the qualified
production that indicates that the qualified production was filmed or
otherwise produced in Nevada or any alternative marketing
promotion acceptable to the Office; and
(h) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company to transmit to each contractor, vendor,
personal service corporation or loan-out company or other business
engaged by the production company to provide goods or perform
services in an aggregate amount of at least $10,000 or more in this
State in connection with a qualified production, not later than 30
calendar days after the production company pays the contractor,
vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out company or other
business, a notification that includes:
(1) A statement that Nevada imposes:
(I) A tax on wages paid by certain employers pursuant to
chapters 363A and 363B of NRS; and
(II) A commerce tax on certain business entities pursuant
to chapter 363C of NRS; and
(2) Instructions for obtaining additional information from the
Department of Taxation regarding the collection and remittance of
taxes pursuant to chapters 363A, 363B and 363C of NRS.
4. An application for a certificate of eligibility submitted
pursuant to subsection 3 must contain:
(a) A script, storyboard or synopsis of the qualified production;
(b) The names of the production company, producer, director
and proposed cast;
(c) An estimated timeline to complete the qualified production;
(d) An estimate of the percentage of principal photography days
of the qualified production that will take place in this State and
outside this State;
(e) An insurance certificate, binder or quote for general liability
insurance of $1,000,000 or more;
(f) The business address of the production company;
(g) The written documentation from the lead participant that is
required by subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 3;
(h) The workforce plan of the production company required by
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of subsection 3; and
(i) Proof that the qualified production meets any applicable
requirements relating to workers’ compensation insurance.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 18 –
5. Within 45 business days after receipt of a final assessment of
the workforce plan provided by a production company pursuant to
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (d) of subsection 3, an audit provided
by a production company pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 3
and any other accountings or other information required by the
Office, the Office shall determine whether to certify the audit and
make a final determination of whether a certificate of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits will be issued. If the Office
certifies the audit, determines that all other requirements for the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits have been met and determines
that a certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax credits will be
issued, the Office shall notify the production company and the lead
participant that the film infrastructure transferable tax credits will be
issued.
6. Within 90 days after the receipt of the notice, the production
company shall make an irrevocable declaration of the amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits that will be applied to
each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, thereby accounting for all
of the credits that will be issued in relation to the qualified
production.
7. Upon receipt of the declaration required by subsection 6, the
Office shall:
(a) Determine an amount of money equal to 1 percentage point
of the percentage of qualified direct production expenditures used to
calculate the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
that will be issued to the production company and cause that amount
of money to be transferred for credit to the Account for Nevada
Film, Media and Related Technology Education and Vocational
Training created by section 38 of this act; and
(b) Issue to the production company a certificate of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits in the amount approved by the
Office for the fees or taxes included in the declaration of the
production company, minus the amount of money transferred
pursuant to paragraph (a). The film infrastructure transferable tax
credits issued under the certificate may not be used before July 1,
2029. The production company shall notify the Office upon
transferring any of the film infrastructure transferable tax credits.
The Office shall notify the Department of Taxation and the Nevada
Gaming Control Board of all film infrastructure transferable tax
credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax set forth in subsection
1, and the amount of any film infrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred.
8. An applicant for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section shall, upon the request of the Executive
Director of the Office, furnish the Executive Director with copies of
-
*AB5_R2*

– 19 –
all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 3.
9. The Office:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing:
(1) Any additional qualified expenditures or production costs
that may serve as the basis for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 12 of this act;
(2) The application review process;
(3) That a production for which records are required by 18
U.S.C. § 2257 to be maintained with respect to any performer in
such production is not eligible for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits; and
(4) Any necessary provisions to ensure compliance with the
requirements of paragraph (d) of subsection 3 relating to workforce
plans; and
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to ensure
that the provisions of sections 2 to 20, inclusive, of this act are
carried out in a manner that is reasonable and customary in the
industry for the production of qualified productions.
10. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which film
infrastructure transferable tax credits will be administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary for the
Department of Taxation and the Nevada Gaming Control Board, as
applicable, to carry out the functions performed by each entity
pursuant to the provisions of sections 2 to 20, inclusive, of this act.
11. As used in this section,:
(a) “Traditionally underrepresented group” means:
(1) Women;
(2) A racial or ethnic minority group;
(3) A group of persons who identify as LGBTQ, which
means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, intersex or any
other nonheterosexual or noncisgender orientation or gender identity
or expression;
(4) A group of persons with disabilities, as defined in 6
NRS 426.068;
(5) Veterans;
(6) Persons who are currently serving on active duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States; or
(7) Persons who were previously incarcerated in a jail or
prison.
(b) “Veteran” means a person who has served in the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
-
*AB5_R2*

– 20 –
National Guard and was separated from such service under
conditions other than dishonorable.
Sec. 12. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection
and subsection 3, qualified direct production expenditures that may
serve as a basis for film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to section 11 of this act must:
(a) Be expenditures made during the period in which a qualified
production is produced;
(b) Be customary and reasonable;
(c) Relate to a category of qualified expenditures and costs listed
in subsection 2; and
(d) Be:
(1) Purchases, rentals or leases of tangible personal property
or services from a Nevada business.
(2) The payroll, including wages, salaries and fringe benefits,
for Nevada residents or other personnel for labor or services
provided in this State. The payroll, including wages, salaries and
fringe benefits, for Nevada residents or other personnel for labor or
services provided outside this State must not be a qualified direct
production expenditure.
(3) Compensation, including wages, salaries, fringe benefits
and other payments, paid to a bona fide third-party service provider,
or to another person receiving the compensation on behalf of the
bona fide third-party service provider, for labor or services provided
in Nevada. Compensation, including wages, salaries, fringe benefits
and other payments, paid to a bona fide third-party service provider,
or to another person receiving the compensation on behalf of the
bona fide third-party service provider, for labor or services provided
outside Nevada must not be a qualified direct production
expenditure.
2. Expenditures or costs that may serve as a basis for
calculating film infrastructure transferable tax credits must relate to:
(a) Set construction and operation;
(b) Wardrobe and makeup;
(c) Photography, sound and lighting;
(d) Filming, film processing and film editing;
(e) The rental or leasing of facilities, equipment and vehicles;
(f) Food and lodging;
(g) Editing, sound mixing, special effects, visual effects and
other postproduction services;
(h) Payment for goods or services provided by a Nevada
business;
(i) The design, construction, improvement or repair of property,
infrastructure, equipment or a production or postproduction facility;
-
*AB5_R2*

– 21 –
(j) State and local government taxes to the extent not included as
part of another cost reported pursuant to this section; or
(k) Any other transaction, service or activity authorized in
regulations adopted by the Office pursuant to section 11 of this act.
3. Expenditures and costs:
(a) Related to:
(1) The acquisition, transfer or use of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits;
(2) Marketing and distribution;
(3) Financing, depreciation and amortization;
(4) The payment of any profits as a result of the qualified
production;
(5) The payment of the cost of the audit required by section
11 of this act; or
(6) The payment for any goods or services that are not
directly attributable to the qualified production;
(b) For which reimbursement is received, or for which
reimbursement is reasonably expected to be received;
(c) Which are paid to a joint venturer or a parent, subsidiary or
other affiliate of the production company, unless the amount paid
represents the fair market value, which may be represented by a rate
sheet, of the purchase, rental or lease of the property or services for
which payment is made;
(d) Which have been previously claimed as a basis for film
infrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to section 11
of this act or noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to NRS 360.759,
 are not qualified direct production expenditures and are not
eligible to serve as a basis for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits issued pursuant to section 11 of this act.
4. If any tangible personal property is acquired by a Nevada
business from a vendor outside this State for immediate resale,
rental or lease to a production company that produces a qualified
production, expenditures incurred by the production company for
the purchase, rental or lease of the property are qualified direct
production expenditures only if:
(a) The Nevada business regularly deals in property of that kind;
(b) The expenditures are otherwise qualified direct production
expenditures under the provisions of this section; and
(c) Not more than 50 percent of the expenditures incurred by the
production company to purchase, rent or lease tangible personal
property for the qualified production are expenditures incurred for
the purchase, rental or lease of tangible personal property in the
manner described in this subsection. For the purposes of the
calculation required by this paragraph, the cost of any property that
-
*AB5_R2*

– 22 –
remains an asset of the Nevada business after production of the
qualified production has concluded must not be included in the
calculation as property purchased, rented or leased in the manner
described in this subsection.
5. If any tangible personal property is acquired by the
production company as an asset, the calculation of the costs of the
tangible personal property that constitute a qualified direct
production expenditure must be performed in the manner prescribed
by the Office by regulation.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Bona fide third-party service provider” means a qualified
entity, a qualified individual or any other person determined by the
Office to be providing necessary and appropriate labor or services
directly related to the production.
(b) “Fringe benefits” means employee expenses paid by an
employer for the use of the employee’s services, including, without
limitation, payments made to a governmental entity, union dues,
health insurance premiums, payments to a pension plan and
payments for workers’ compensation insurance.
(c) “Qualified entity” means an entity that is:
(1) A personal service corporation, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
269A(b)(1), a payroll services corporation or any entity receiving
payments for services performed in this State by a qualified
individual; and
(2) Registered to conduct business pursuant to the laws of
this State.
(d) “Qualified individual” means any natural person who
performs services during the production period in an activity related
to the production of a qualified production. The term does not
include:
(1) Any natural person related to the production company or
an employee as described in subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of 26
U.S.C. § 51(i)(1).
(2) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
416(i)(1)(B), of the production company.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4
and 5, the Office shall not issue film infrastructure transferable tax
credits to a production company pursuant to section 11 of this
act unless, in addition to meeting any other requirements for
the issuance of film infrastructure transferable tax credits, the
production company satisfies the applicable requirement for the
employment of Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of
the qualified production as follows:
(a) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
-
*AB5_R2*

– 23 –
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2026, and
before July 1, 2027, at least 10 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(b) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2027, and
before July 1, 2028, at least 15 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(c) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2028, and
before July 1, 2029, at least 20 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(d) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2029, and
before July 1, 2030, at least 25 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(e) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2030, and
before July 1, 2031, at least 30 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(f) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2031, and
before July 1, 2032, at least 40 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(g) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2032, and
before July 1, 2038, at least 50 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(h) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after July 1, 2038, and
before July 1, 2044, at least 60 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
2. To satisfy the applicable requirement for the employment of
Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of the qualified
production, as set forth in subsection 1, the production company
producing the qualified production must satisfy the applicable
requirement under both of the following calculations:
(a) The percentage calculated by dividing a numerator
consisting of the number of workdays worked by Nevada residents
-
*AB5_R2*

– 24 –
who are below-the-line personnel, excluding background actors, for
labor or services provided in this State by a denominator consisting
of the number of workdays worked by all below-the-line personnel,
excluding background actors, for labor or services provided in this
State, must exceed the applicable requirement set forth in subsection
1; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the
percentage calculated by dividing a numerator consisting of the
wages and salaries paid to Nevada residents who are below-the-line
personnel, excluding background actors, for labor or services
provided in this State by a denominator consisting of the total wages
and salaries paid to all below-the-line personnel, excluding
background actors, for labor or services provided in this State, must
exceed the applicable requirement set forth in subsection 1.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, for the
purposes of the calculation required by paragraph (b) of subsection
2, wages and salaries paid to persons employed as one of each of the
following below-the-line personnel must not be included in the
calculation of the denominator as total wages and salaries paid to all
below-the-line personnel for labor or services provided in this State:
(a) Director of photography;
(b) First assistant director;
(c) Editor;
(d) VFX supervisor;
(e) Costume designer;
(f) Costume supervisor;
(g) Production designer;
(h) Unit production manager;
(i) Construction coordinator;
(j) Set decorator;
(k) Supervising art director;
(l) Financial controller;
(m) Special effects supervisor;
(n) Art director;
(o) Stunt coordinator;
(p) Makeup artist;
(q) Key hairstylist;
(r) Propmaster;
(s) Gaffer;
(t) Camera operator or steadicam operator;
(u) Sound mixer;
(v) Choreographer; and
(w) Any other position deemed by the Executive Director to be
specialized.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 25 –
4. A calculation required by paragraph (b) of subsection 2
using a denominator adjusted pursuant to subsection 3 must not
result in the applicable requirement set forth in subsection 1 being
less than 80 percent of that applicable requirement.
5. A production company that has applied for a certificate of
eligibility for film infrastructure tax credits pursuant to section 11
of this act may, at any time, apply to the Executive Director of
the Office for a waiver of the applicable requirement for the
employment of Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of the
qualified production, as set forth in subsection 1. The Executive
Director of the Office shall approve such a waiver if the production
company provides evidence satisfactory to the Executive Director
that:
(a) A good faith effort was made to identify and hire Nevada
residents to satisfy the applicable requirement of paragraph (b) of
subsection 2; and
(b) There is an insufficient number of Nevada residents is
available and qualified for employment as below-the-line personnel
of the qualified production.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 4 and section 15 of this act, the base amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits issued to an eligible
production company pursuant to section 11 of this act must equal 30
percent of the qualified direct production expenditures.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and section 15
of this act, if the production company submitted the application for
the certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 11 of this act on or after the date on
which the Office adopts the regulations required by section 11 of
this act, the Office shall not issue any film infrastructure transferable
tax credits to the production company for the qualified production if
the final assessment of the workforce plan submitted by the
production company for the qualified production pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 3 of section 11 of this act does not
include documentation that the diversity goals set forth in
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (d) of subsection 3 of section 11 of
this act were met.
3. The Executive Director of the Office shall waive a reduction
in the cumulative amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits required pursuant to subsection 2 upon written proof to the
Executive Director that the production company made a good faith
effort to meet the requirements of that paragraph and there is an
insufficient number of persons available and qualified to meet the
requirements.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 26 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Executive
Director of the Office may:
(a) Reduce the cumulative amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits that are calculated pursuant to this section by
an amount equal to any damages incurred by the State or any
political subdivision of the State as a result of a qualified production
that is produced in this State; or
(b) Withhold film infrastructure transferable tax credits, in
whole or in part:
(1) Until any pending legal action in this State against a
production company or involving a qualified production is resolved.
(2) If a production company violates any state or local law.
(3) If a production company is found to have knowingly
submitted any false statement, representation or certification in any
document submitted for the purpose of obtaining film infrastructure
transferable tax credits.
5. Before taking any action authorized by subsection 4, the
Executive Director of the Office shall:
(a) Consider any documentation submitted by the production
company related to the action under consideration;
(b) Make the following determinations in writing:
(1) That good cause exists to take such action;
(2) That the action is reasonable based on the circumstances
of the underlying incident on which the reduction or withholding of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits authorized pursuant to
subsection 4 is based; and
(3) The amount of any reduction or withholding of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits authorized pursuant to
subsection 4 is commensurate with the severity of the underlying
incident on which the reduction or withholding is based; and
(c) Notify the production company, in writing, of the
determination made pursuant to paragraph (b).
Sec. 15. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Office shall not approve any application for a certificate of
eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax credits submitted
pursuant to section 11 of this act if:
(a) Approval of the application would cause the total amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved pursuant to
section 11 of this act to exceed the sum of $95,000,000 for each
fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2029.
(b) The application is submitted by a production company in a
fiscal year that begins on or after July 1, 2044.
2. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1 and subsection 3, the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits authorized for a fiscal year that are not approved for that
-
*AB5_R2*

– 27 –
fiscal year may be carried forward and made available for approval
only during the next fiscal year, but the amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits carried forward and made
available for approval during the next fiscal year must not exceed
$47,500,000. For any fiscal year to which film infrastructure
transferable tax credits are carried forward from the immediately
preceding fiscal year pursuant to this subsection, the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits that have been carried forward
must be deemed to be the first film infrastructure transferable tax
credits approved until the total amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits carried forward from the immediately
preceding fiscal year have been approved.
3. If the Summerlin Production Studios Project does not satisfy
the criteria set forth in sub-subparagraph (I) of subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of section 10 of this act, the Office
shall not issue a certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits to a production company that produces a qualified
production for which a certificate of eligibility has been issued
pursuant to section 11 of this act.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the Office
approves an application for a certificate of eligibility pursuant to
section 11 of this act:
(a) Before July 1, 2029, the Office shall assign the amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits identified under the
certificate of eligibility to Fiscal Year 2029-2030.
(b) On or after July 1, 2029, the Office shall assign the amount
of film infrastructure transferable tax credits identified under the
certificate of eligibility to the fiscal year in which the application for
the certificate of eligibility is approved.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office
under a certificate of eligibility issued to a production company
pursuant to section 11 of this act that exceeds the amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office under a
certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued to the
production company pursuant to section 11 of this act may be added
to the amount made available for approval during subsequent fiscal
years.
6. The film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued to any
production company for any qualified production pursuant to
section 11 of this act expire at the end of the calendar year that is 6
years after the date on which the film infrastructure transferable tax
credits are issued to the production company.
Sec. 16. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
if an application for a certificate of eligibility is approved pursuant
-
*AB5_R2*

– 28 –
to section 11 of this act, principal photography of the qualified
production must begin not more than 90 days after the date on
which the decision on the application is issued. The Office:
(a) Shall prescribe by regulation the procedure for determining
the date of commencement of qualified productions that do not
include photography for the purposes of this section.
(b) May extend by not more than 90 days the period otherwise
prescribed by this subsection, except that in the case of a force
majeure, the Office may extend the period for more than 90 days.
2. A production company that produces a qualified production
shall submit the final assessment of the workforce plan and audit
required by section 11 of this act and all other required information
to the Office and the Department of Taxation within the time
required by paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection 3 of section 11 of this
act, as applicable. Production of the qualified production must be
completed within 18 months after the date of commencement of
principal photography, except that the Office may extend this period
for completion of the qualified production by not more than 6
months. If the Office or the Department determines that information
submitted pursuant to this subsection is incomplete, the production
company shall, not later than 30 days after receiving notice that the
information is incomplete, provide to the Office or the Department,
as applicable, all additional information required by the Office or
the Department.
Sec. 17. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
production company that is found to have knowingly submitted any
false statement, representation or certification in any document
submitted for the purpose of obtaining film infrastructure
transferable tax credits, or that otherwise becomes ineligible for film
infrastructure transferable tax credits after receiving the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to section 11 of this
act, shall repay to the Department of Taxation or the Nevada
Gaming Control Board, as applicable, any portion of the film
infrastructure transferable tax credits to which the production
company is not entitled.
2. Film infrastructure transferable tax credits purchased in
good faith are not subject to forfeiture or repayment by the
transferee unless the transferee submitted fraudulent information in
connection with the purchase.
3. A production company is not required to forfeit or repay any
portion of the film infrastructure transferable tax credits to which
the production company is otherwise entitled if the production
company demonstrates that the production company became
ineligible for the film infrastructure transferable tax credits as a
result of unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the
-
*AB5_R2*

– 29 –
production company, including, without limitation, an event in the
nature of force majeure.
Sec. 18. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
not later than June 30, 2026, the Clark County Board of County
Commissioners shall create a production studio entertainment
district for the purpose of enhancing early childhood education
opportunities, including public prekindergarten, for children in
Clark County. The Clark County Board of County Commissioners
shall not create a production studio entertainment district pursuant to
this section if the Office and the lead participant in the Summerlin
Production Studios Project have not entered into a development
agreement pursuant to section 10 of this act within the period
required by that section or, if a production studio entertainment
district has been created, the Clark County Board of County
Commissioners shall dissolve the district if the Office and the lead
participant in the Project have not entered into a development
agreement pursuant to section 10 of this act within the period
required by that section. The district must:
(a) Be located entirely within the unincorporated areas of Clark
County and outside the boundaries of any incorporated city;
(b) Include all parcels of land that are located within the
boundaries of the Summerlin Production Studios Project; and
(c) Not include any parcels of land other than the parcels of land
described in paragraph (b).
2. To make payments pursuant to subsections 3 and 4, the
Clark County Board of County Commissioners shall pledge the
proceeds of the following taxes, fees and charges, but excluding any
taxes, fees or charges imposed for the purpose of providing services
related to public safety or indigent services pursuant to any
provision of law and any amount pledged for the repayment of a
bond issued before the effective date of this act:
(a) The tax imposed for the purposes of NRS 244A.597 to
244A.655, inclusive, at the rate of 4 percent of the gross receipts
from the rental of transient lodging within the production studio
entertainment district;
(b) The tax imposed pursuant to NRS 244.3352 at the rate of 2
percent of the gross receipts from the rental of transient lodging
within the production studio entertainment district;
(c) The taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS on
property of any kind within the production studio entertainment
district for the general operating expenses of Clark County;
(d) The taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS on
property of any kind within the production studio entertainment
district for the general operating expenses of Summerlin Town; and
-
*AB5_R2*

– 30 –
(e) The basic city-county relief tax, as defined in NRS 377.020,
with regard to tangible personal property sold at retail, or stored,
used or otherwise consumed, in the production studio entertainment
district, after the deduction made as compensation to the State for
the cost of collecting the tax.
3. After the creation of the production studio entertainment
district, the Department of Taxation, the Clark County Board of
County Commissioners, the Board of Trustees of the Clark County
School District and the Board of the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program shall enter into an agreement to transfer money secured by
a pledge of, and payable from, any money pledged pursuant to
subsection 2 and received with respect to the district. The agreement
must provide for a transfer to:
(a) The Public Employees’ Benefits Program of money pledged
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2 and received by Clark
County, specifying the dates and procedure for the distribution of
money pledged pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2, for credit
to a separate account administered by the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program, which must be used to make health
reimbursement arrangement contributions for active state employees
and to pay the share of the cost of qualified medical expenses for
each person who has retired with state service and whose coverage
is provided through the Public Employees’ Benefits Program by an
individual medical plan offered pursuant to the Health Insurance for
the Aged Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395 et seq., starting in Fiscal Year
2031-2032 and each biennium thereafter.
(b) The Clark County School District of money pledged
pursuant to paragraphs (b) to (e), inclusive, of subsection 2 and
received by the Department of Taxation or Clark County, including,
without limitation, specifying the dates and procedure for the
distribution of money pledged pursuant to subsection 2. An
agreement entered into pursuant to this section is not subject to the
limitations of subsection 1 of NRS 354.626 and may, at the option
of the Clark County Board of County Commissioners, be binding on
Clark County beyond the fiscal year in which it was made, if the
agreement pertains solely to the money pledged pursuant to
subsection 2.
4. The Clark County School District shall:
(a) Deposit all money received pursuant to this section in a
separate account established and administered by the Board of
Trustees of the Clark County School District and use money in such
account solely for the purposes of prekindergarten education
programs in the Clark County School District, which, at the
discretion of the Clark County School District, may include, without
limitation, the development and implementation of early childhood
-
*AB5_R2*

– 31 –
education pathways for the Clark County School District in
collaboration with the College of Education at the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas.
(b) Submit a report on or before July 1 of each year on the use
of all money received pursuant to this section to the Office of
Economic Development within the Office of the Governor. The
Office shall include the report received from the Clark County
School District in the report required pursuant to section 20 of this
act.
5. The Department of Taxation may adopt regulations
regarding procedures for the identification and segmentation with
respect to the production studio entertainment district of the taxes,
fees and charges described in subsection 2.
6. The Clark County Board of County Commissioners may
adopt, by ordinance, procedures for the identification and
segmentation with respect to the production studio entertainment
district of the taxes, fees and charges described in subsection 2.
7. The Department of Taxation and Clark County, and any
other local government or public body to which the taxes, fees and
charges described in subsection 2 are paid, shall provide
commercially reasonable procedures by which such taxes, fees and
charges paid by any business or other person operating in the
production studio entertainment district are to be identified and
segmented. All such businesses or other persons operating in the
production studio entertainment district shall follow the established
commercially reasonable procedures.
8. The provisions of this section must not be applied to modify,
directly or indirectly, any taxes levied or revenues pledged to impair
adversely any outstanding obligations of any local government or
the State, including, without limitation, bonds, notes, medium-term
financing, letters of credit and any other financial obligation, until
all such obligations have been discharged in full or provision for
their payment and redemption has been fully made.
Sec. 19. 1. The lead participant shall, on or before August 1
of each even-numbered year, prepare and submit to the Governor,
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Legislature and the Office a report on the performance of the Project
for the immediately preceding period consisting of 2 fiscal years and
cumulatively for the period beginning on the effective date of this
act and ending on the last day of the immediately preceding fiscal
year. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the report
must include, without limitation:
(a) The following information concerning the development of
the Project:
-
*AB5_R2*

– 32 –
(1) The cumulative capital investment, by component,
including the studio campus, vocational-training studio and
supporting uses;
(2) Square footage delivered and acreage improved, by
component;
(3) The status of capital investment requirements and
requirements for direct production expenditures included in the
development agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
section 10 of this act and any penalties imposed on the Project
pursuant to section 10 of this act;
(4) Any improvements to public infrastructure installed or
financed by the Project;
(5) Any capital investment outside of the site of the Project
credited toward meeting the capital investment requirements
included in the development agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of section 10 of this act;
(6) The primary user or tenant of each completed building
and space occupied and a brief business description;
(7) The share of total occupied square footage used by firms
whose principal business supports motion picture, television, digital
media or related content-creation activities;
(8) Total employment related to construction of the Project;
(9) Total employment at the Project that is not related to
construction of the Project;
(10) Aggregate wages and salaries paid to employees in
industries related to the Project, separately by industry;
(11) An analysis of the employment of Nevada residents in
industries related to the Project and plans to increase the percentage
of Nevada residents who are employed in industries related to the
Project;
(12) Demographic information concerning persons who
participate in a program of vocational training and education offered
at the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio;
(13) Any community investments in workforce training and
education; and
(14) Any efforts to develop vendor procurement
opportunities for small businesses and businesses owned by women,
veterans or other traditionally underrepresented groups.
(b) The following information concerning the production of
qualified productions, in whole or in part, at the site of the Project,
regardless of whether the production company applies for or is
issued film infrastructure transferable tax credits for the qualified
production:
(1) The total amount of direct production expenditures, as
defined in section 10 of this act;
-
*AB5_R2*

– 33 –
(2) The aggregate number of persons in Nevada employed by
qualified productions, the aggregate amount of wages paid to those
persons and aggregated demographic information concerning those
persons;
(3) The number of persons employed by each qualified
production who were paid compensation of more than $1,000,000
for labor or services provided for the qualified production and the
total number of persons employed by qualified productions were
paid more than $1,000,000 for labor or services provided for the
qualified production;
(4) For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of below-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who
were Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the number of
workdays worked by Nevada residents who are below-the-line
personnel, excluding background actors, by the number of workdays
worked by all below-the-line personnel, excluding background
actors;
(5) For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of below-line personnel, by
occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who were
Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the wages and salaries paid
to Nevada residents who are below-the-line personnel, excluding
background actors, for labor or services provided in this State by the
total wages and salaries paid to all below-the-line personnel,
excluding background actors;
(6) For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of above-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who
were Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the number of
workdays worked by Nevada residents who are above-the-line
personnel by the number of workdays worked by all above-the-line
personnel;
(7) For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of above-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who
were Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the wages and
salaries paid to Nevada residents who are above-the-line personnel
for labor or services provided in this State by the total wages and
salaries paid to all above-the-line personnel;
(8) For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of total compensation paid to
above-the-line personnel, by occupation and in aggregate, and the
percentage of total compensation paid to below-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate;
-
*AB5_R2*

– 34 –
(9) The period during which each qualified production was in
Nevada and employed persons in Nevada; and
(10) The number of qualified productions that were produced
by persons or entities that are affiliated with the Summerlin
Production Studios Project and the number of qualified productions
that were produced by persons or entities that are not affiliated with
the Project.
2. The Executive Director of the Office shall waive any
requirement to report pursuant to subsection 1 that would result in
the disclosure of the compensation of an individual, any personally
identifiable information or a trade secret, as defined in NRS
600A.030, except that the Executive Director shall require the
reporting of such information, as described in subsection 1, in
aggregated form to avoid the disclosure of the compensation of an
individual, any personally identifiable information or a trade secret,
as defined in NRS 600A.030.
3. If any information required to be submitted to the Office
pursuant to subparagraph (3) to (8), inclusive, of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 has been submitted to the Office pursuant to an audit
conducted pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 3 of section 11 of
this act, such information may be reported to the Office by reference
to the information already provided to eliminate any duplicative
reporting.
4. The Office shall include a copy of the report received from
the Project in the report required by section 20 of this act.
Sec. 20. The Office shall include in the report prepared and
submitted pursuant to NRS 360.7598, on or before December 1 of
each even-numbered year, to the Governor and to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature, a
report for the two immediately preceding fiscal years and
cumulatively for the period beginning on the effective date of this
act and ending on the last day of the immediately preceding fiscal
year:
1. The information provided to the Office pursuant to section
19 of this act;
2. The status of capital investment requirements and
requirements for direct production expenditures included in the
development agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
section 10 of this act and any penalties imposed on the Project
pursuant to section 10 of this act;
3. The following information related to applications for film
infrastructure transferable tax credits and qualified productions:
(a) The number of applications submitted for a certificate of
eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to
section 11 of this act;
-
*AB5_R2*

– 35 –
(b) The number of qualified productions for which film
infrastructure transferable tax credits were approved;
(c) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
approved;
(d) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
used;
(e) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred; and
(f) The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
taken against each allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount
used and outstanding, in total and for each qualified production;
4. Recommendations for strengthening the overall operation of
the program for the issuance of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits, including, without limitation, methods to promote and
encourage the development and establishment of production
companies in Nevada, including, without limitation, production
companies that are not affiliated with the Summerlin Production
Studios Project;
5. An overview of the motion picture and television industry in
this State, including, without limitation, the total number of
qualified productions in this State for which film infrastructure
transferable tax credits or noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
have not been approved, data concerning employment in the motion
picture and television industry in this State and production revenue
generated in this State;
6. Demographic information concerning persons who
participate in a program of vocational training and education offered
at the Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio, or if the Nevada
Partners Vocational Training Studio is not completed and
operational, the equivalent facility that is completed and operational;
7. Demographic information concerning persons who
participate in a program of vocational training and education offered
at the center described in subparagraph (6) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of section 10 of this act, or if that is not completed and
operational, the equivalent facility that is completed and operational
pursuant to subparagraph (7) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
section 10 of this act;
8. The report received from the Clark County School District
pursuant to subsection 4 of section 18 of this act;
9. The report received from the Summerlin Production Studios
Project pursuant to subsection 2 of section 19 of this act; and
10. The compilation of information provided in reports made
by recipients of grants from the Account for Nevada Film, Media
and Related Technology Education and Vocational Training created
-
*AB5_R2*

– 36 –
by section 38 of this act, which is provided to the Office pursuant to
section 40 of this act.
Sec. 21. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor shall submit a request to the State Board of Examiners
to suspend the authority of taxpayers to redeem film infrastructure
transferable tax credits issued pursuant to section 11 of this act or
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to NRS
360.759, or both, if, at any time during a fiscal year, the Economic
Forum projects that the anticipated revenue of the State for that
fiscal year will fall short by 10 percent or more of the total
anticipated revenue for the fiscal year, as projected by the
Economic Forum for that fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 of NRS 353.228 and as adjusted by any legislation
enacted by the Legislature that affects state revenue for that fiscal
year.
2. The State Board of Examiners shall consider a request
made pursuant to subsection 1 and shall, if it finds that a
suspension is warranted based on the magnitude of the shortfall in
revenue, recommend to the Interim Finance Committee for its
independent evaluation and action that the suspension be imposed
for a period of time not to exceed 18 months after the date on
which the suspension is imposed. The Interim Finance Committee
is not bound to follow the recommendation of the State Board of
Examiners.
3. If the Interim Finance Committee finds that a suspension
recommended by the State Board of Examiners should and may
lawfully be made, the Committee shall by resolution direct the
Department of Taxation and the Nevada Gaming Control Board to
suspend the redemption of any film infrastructure transferable tax
credits issued pursuant to section 11 of this act or any
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued pursuant to NRS
360.759, or both, for a period of time not to exceed 18 months
after the date on which the suspension is imposed.
4. If a resolution is issued pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) The expiration date for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits set forth pursuant to section 15 of this act and
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits set forth pursuant to
NRS 360.7594, for which the suspension is imposed, must be
extended by the number of days that such transferable tax credits
may not be redeemed pursuant to the resolution.
(b) The total amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits set forth pursuant to section 15 of this act and
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits set forth pursuant to
-
*AB5_R2*

– 37 –
NRS 360.7594 used by all taxpayers must not exceed 133 percent
of the total amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to section 15 of this act and noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.7594 authorized for
a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2029, and before
June 30, 2044.
(c) For the purposes of paragraph (b), film infrastructure
transferable tax credits set forth pursuant to section 15 of this act
and noninfrastructure transferable tax credits set forth pursuant
to NRS 360.7594 must be accepted based on the date on which
they were issued, with the credits issued earliest in time accepted
until the limit set forth in paragraph (b) is met.
Sec. 22. Chapter 360 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4 and 5, the
Office shall not issue noninfrastructure transferable tax credits to
a production company pursuant to NRS 360.759 unless, in
addition to meeting any other requirements for the issuance of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits, the production
company satisfies the applicable requirement for the employment
of Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of the qualified
production as follows:
(a) For a qualified production that submits an application for
a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2026, and
before July 1, 2027, at least 10 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(b) For a qualified production that submits an application for
a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2027, and
before July 1, 2028, at least 15 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(c) For a qualified production that submits an application for
a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2028, and
before July 1, 2029, at least 20 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(d) For a qualified production that submits an application for
a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2029, and
before July 1, 2030, at least 25 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(e) For a qualified production that submits an application for
a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2030, and
-
*AB5_R2*

– 38 –
before July 1, 2031, at least 30 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(f) For a qualified production that submits an application for a
certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2031, and
before July 1, 2032, at least 40 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(g) For a qualified production that submits an application for
a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2032, and
before July 1, 2038, at least 50 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
(h) For a qualified production that submits an application for
a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after July 1, 2038, and
before July 1, 2044, at least 60 percent of the below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
2. To satisfy the applicable requirement for the employment
of Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of the qualified
production, as set forth in subsection 1, the production company
producing the qualified production must satisfy the applicable
requirement under both of the following calculations:
(a) The percentage calculated by dividing a numerator
consisting of the number of workdays worked by Nevada residents
who are below-the-line personnel, excluding background actors,
for labor or services provided in this State by a denominator
consisting of the number of workdays worked by all below-the-line
personnel, excluding background actors, for labor or services
provided in this State, must exceed the applicable requirement set
forth in subsection 1; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the
percentage calculated by dividing a numerator consisting of the
wages and salaries paid to Nevada residents who are below-the-
line personnel, excluding background actors, for labor or services
provided in this State by a denominator consisting of the total
wages and salaries paid to all below-the-line personnel, excluding
background actors, for labor or services provided in this State,
must exceed the applicable requirement set forth in subsection 1.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, for the
purposes of the calculation required by paragraph (b) of
subsection 2, wages and salaries paid to persons employed as one
of each of the following below-the-line personnel must not be
included in the calculation of the denominator as total wages and
salaries paid to all below-the-line personnel for labor or services
provided in this State:
-
*AB5_R2*

– 39 –
(a) Director of photography;
(b) First assistant director;
(c) Editor;
(d) VFX supervisor;
(e) Costume designer;
(f) Costume supervisor;
(g) Production designer;
(h) Unit production manager;
(i) Construction coordinator;
(j) Set decorator;
(k) Supervising art director;
(l) Financial controller;
(m) Special effects supervisor;
(n) Art director;
(o) Stunt coordinator;
(p) Makeup artist;
(q) Key hairstylist;
(r) Propmaster;
(s) Gaffer;
(t) Camera operator or steadicam operator;
(u) Sound mixer;
(v) Choreographer; and
(w) Any other position deemed by the Executive Director to be
specialized.
4. A calculation required by paragraph (b) of subsection 2
using a denominator adjusted pursuant to subsection 3 must not
result in the applicable requirement set forth in subsection 1 being
less than 80 percent of that applicable requirement.
5. A production company that has applied for a certificate of
eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant
to NRS 360.759 may, at any time, apply to the Executive Director
of the Office for a waiver of the applicable requirement for the
employment of Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of
the qualified production, as set forth in subsection 1. The
Executive Director of the Office shall approve such a waiver if the
production company provides evidence satisfactory to the
Executive Director that:
(a) A good faith effort was made to identify and hire Nevada
residents to satisfy the applicable requirement of paragraph (d) of
subsection 3; and
(b) There is an insufficient number of Nevada residents is
available and qualified for employment as below-the-line
personnel of the qualified production.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 40 –
Sec. 23. NRS 360.758 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.758 As used in NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive, and
section 22 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 360.7581 to 360.7586, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 24. NRS 360.7582 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7582 “Below-the-line personnel” means a person
employed to work on a qualified production after production begins
and before production is completed, including, without limitation,
[an extra,] a background actor, best boy, boom operator, camera
loader, camera operator, assistant camera operator, compositor,
dialogue editor, film editor, assistant film editor, focus puller, Foley
operator, Foley editor, gaffer, grip, key grip, lighting crew, lighting
board operator, lighting technician, music editor, sound editor,
sound effects editor, sound mixer, steadicam operator, first assistant
camera operator, second assistant camera operator, digital imaging
technician, camera operator working with a director of photography,
electric best boy, grip best boy, dolly grip, rigging grip, assistant
key for makeup, assistant key for hair, assistant script supervisor, set
construction foreperson, lead set dresser, assistant key for wardrobe,
scenic foreperson, assistant propmaster, assistant audio mixer,
assistant boom person, assistant key for special effects and other
similar personnel. The term does not include above-the-line
personnel.
Sec. 25. NRS 360.7586 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7586 1. “Qualified production” includes preproduction,
production and postproduction and means:
(a) A theatrical, direct-to-video or other media motion picture.
(b) A made-for-television motion picture.
(c) Visual effects or digital animation sequences.
(d) A television pilot program.
(e) A television, Internet or other media series, including,
without limitation, a comedy, drama, miniseries, soap opera, talk
show, game show or telenovela, or an episode of such a series.
(f) A reality show.
(g) A national or regional commercial or series of commercials.
(h) An infomercial.
(i) A music video.
(j) A documentary film or series.
(k) Other visual media productions, including, without
limitation, video games , digital media and mobile applications.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A news, weather or current events program.
(b) A production that is primarily produced for industrial,
corporate or institutional use.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 41 –
(c) A telethon or any production that solicits money, other than a
production which is produced for national distribution.
(d) A political advertisement.
(e) A sporting event, including, without limitation, a sportscast,
preshow, postshow or sports newscast related to a sporting event. A
qualified production described by subsection 1 shall not be deemed
a sporting event for the purposes of this paragraph for the sole
reason that it features athletes or relates to sports.
(f) A gala, pageant or awards show.
(g) Any type of media production created solely for the purpose
of posting the production on social media, as defined by
regulations adopted by the Office pursuant to NRS 360.759.
(h) Any other type of production that is excluded by regulations
adopted by the Office of Economic Development pursuant to
NRS 360.759.
Sec. 26. NRS 360.759 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.759 1. A production company that produces a qualified
production in this State in whole or in part may apply to the Office
of Economic Development for a certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits for any qualified direct
production expenditures. The noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed pursuant to chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.7594, the
Office [may] shall approve an application for a certificate of
eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits if the Office
finds that the production company producing the qualified
production qualifies for the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to subsection 3. If the Office approves the
application, the Office shall [calculate] :
(a) Calculate the estimated amount of the noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.7592, 360.7593 and
360.7594 [.] ; and
(b) Immediately forward a copy of the certificate of eligibility
that identifies the estimated amount of the noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits to:
(1) The applicant;
(2) The Department of Taxation; and
(3) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 42 –
3. To be eligible for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section, a production company must:
(a) [Submit] Before the beginning of principal photography,
submit to the Office an application for a certificate of eligibility that
meets the requirements of subsection 4;
(b) [Provide proof satisfactory] Submit to the Office [that the
qualified production is in the economic interest of the State;
(c) Provide proof satisfactory to the Office] with the application
for a certificate of eligibility:
(1) Proof that 70 percent or more of the funding for the
qualified production has been obtained;
[(d) Provide proof satisfactory to the Office] and
(2) Proof that [at] :
(I) At least [60] 50 percent of the [direct production
expenditures for:
(1) Preproduction;
(2) Production; and
(3) If any direct production expenditures for postproduction
will be incurred in this State, postproduction,
] total principal photography days of the qualified production
will [be incurred] take place in this State [as qualified direct
production expenditures;
(e)] ; or
(II) The qualified production will incur qualified direct
production expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000;
(c) Satisfy the applicable requirement for the employment of
Nevada residents as below-the-line personnel of the qualified
production, as set forth in section 22 of this act;
(d) Provide to the Office:
(1) With the application for a certificate of eligibility, proof
that the applicant has in place a workforce plan for the qualified
production that outlines specific goals for:
(I) Hiring a workforce that reflects the diversity of this
State, with not less than 30 percent of the persons hired for
qualified productions being members of a traditionally
underrepresented group;
(II) Adopting nondiscriminatory policies and practices
to ensure that the qualified production does not discriminate in
employment, contracting or any other term or condition of
participation in the qualified production, against any protected
class of individuals pursuant to state or federal law;
(III) Using vendors that are minority-owned business
enterprises or woman-owned business enterprises; and
(IV) Achieving the requirements set forth in subsection
3 of 360.7592; and
-
*AB5_R2*

– 43 –
(2) Not later than 365 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production, unless the Office agrees
to extend this period by not more than 180 days, a final assessment
of the workforce plan that includes documentation on whether the
production met or made good faith efforts to achieve the goals set
forth in the workforce plan;
(e) Not later than [270] 365 days after the completion of
principal photography of the qualified production or, if any direct
production expenditures for postproduction will be incurred in this
State, not later than [270] 365 days after the completion of
postproduction, unless the Office agrees to extend this period by not
more than [90] 180 days, provide the Office with an audit of the
qualified production that includes [an] :
(1) An itemized report of qualified direct production
expenditures which:
[(1)] (I) Shows that the qualified production incurred
qualified direct production expenditures of $500,000 or more; [and
(2)] (II) If the production company complied with the
requirement of subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) by providing to
the Office with the application for a certificate of eligibility proof
that the qualified production would incur qualified direct
production expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000, shows
that the qualified production incurred qualified direct production
expenditures in this State of at least $5,000,000; and
(III) Is certified by an independent certified public
accountant in this State who is approved by the Office;
(2) A list of each contractor, vendor, personal service
corporation or loan-out company or other business engaged by the
production company to provide goods or perform services in an
aggregate amount of at least $10,000 or more in this State in
connection with the qualified production and the amount paid to
each contractor, vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out
company or other business for such goods or services; and
(3) Proof that the production company secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production was produced;
(f) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (e);
(g) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company to include:
(1) In the end screen credits of the qualified production, a
logo of this State provided by the Office which indicates that the
qualified production was filmed or otherwise produced in Nevada;
or
(2) If the qualified production does not have end screen
credits, another acknowledgment in the final version of the qualified
-
*AB5_R2*

– 44 –
production which indicates that the qualified production was filmed
or otherwise produced in Nevada [;] or any alternative marketing
promotion acceptable to the Office; and
(h) [Meet any other requirements prescribed by regulation
pursuant to this section.] Enter into a written agreement with the
Office that requires the production company to transmit to each
contractor, vendor, personal service corporation or loan-out
company or other business engaged by the production company to
provide goods or perform services in an aggregate amount of at
least $10,000 or more in this State in connection with a qualified
production, not later than 30 calendar days after the production
company pays the contractor, vendor, personal service corporation
or loan-out company or other business, a notification that
includes:
(1) A statement that Nevada imposes:
(I) A tax on wages paid by certain employers pursuant to
chapters 363A and 363B of NRS; and
(II) A commerce tax on certain business entities
pursuant to chapter 363C of NRS; and
(2) Instructions for obtaining additional information from
the Department of Taxation regarding the collection and
remittance of taxes pursuant to chapters 363A, 363B and 363C of
NRS.
4. An application for a certificate of eligibility submitted
pursuant to subsection 3 must contain:
(a) A script, storyboard or synopsis of the qualified production;
(b) The names of the production company, producer, director
and proposed cast;
(c) An estimated timeline to complete the qualified production;
(d) [A summary of the budgeted expenditures for the entire
production, including projected expenditures to be incurred outside
of Nevada;] An estimate of the percentage of principal
photography days of the qualified production that will take place
in this State and outside this State;
(e) Details regarding the financing of the project, including,
without limitation, any information relating to a binding financing
commitment, loan application, commitment letter or investment
letter;
(f) An insurance certificate, binder or quote for general liability
insurance of $1,000,000 or more;
(g) The business address of the production company;
(h) Proof that the qualified production meets any applicable
requirements relating to workers’ compensation insurance; and
-
*AB5_R2*

– 45 –
(i) [Proof that the production company has secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production will be produced; and
(j) Any other information required by regulations adopted by the
Office pursuant to subsection 8.] The workforce plan of the
production company that is required by paragraph (d) of
subsection 3.
5. [If the Office approves an application for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a copy of the certificate of
eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the tax credits
available pursuant to NRS 360.7592 to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
6.] Within [60] 45 business days after receipt of a final
assessment of the workforce plan provided by a production
company pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 3, an audit provided by a production company pursuant
to paragraph (e) of subsection 3 and any other accountings or other
information required by the Office, the Office shall determine
whether to certify the audit and make a final determination of
whether a certificate of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
will be issued. If the Office certifies the audit, determines that all
other requirements for the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
have been met and determines that a certificate of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits will be issued, the Office shall notify the
production company that the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits will be issued.
6. Within [30] 90 days after the receipt of the notice, the
production company shall make an irrevocable declaration of the
amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits that will be
applied to each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, thereby
accounting for all of the credits which will be issued [.] in relation
to the qualified production. Upon receipt of the declaration, the
Office shall [issue] :
(a) Determine an amount of money equal to 1 percentage point
of the percentage of qualified direct production expenditures used
to calculate the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits that will be issued to the production company and cause
that amount of money to be transferred for credit to the Account
for Nevada Film, Media and Related Technology Education and
Vocational Training created by section 38 of this act; and
(b) Issue to the production company a certificate of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits in the amount approved
-
*AB5_R2*

– 46 –
by the Office for the fees or taxes included in the declaration of the
production company [.] , minus the amount of money transferred
pursuant to paragraph (a). The production company shall notify
the Office upon transferring any of the noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits. The Office shall notify the Department and
the Nevada Gaming Control Board of all noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax set
forth in subsection 1, and the amount of any noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits transferred.
7. An applicant for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section shall, upon the request of the Executive
Director of the Office, furnish the Executive Director with copies of
all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 3.
8. The Office:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing:
(1) [Any additional requirements to receive transferable tax
credits;
(2)] Any additional qualified expenditures or production
costs that may serve as the basis for noninfrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.7591;
[(3) Any additional information that must be included with
an application pursuant to subsection 4;
(4)] (2) The application review process;
[(5) Any type of qualified]
(3) That a production for which [, due to obscene or sexually
explicit material,] records are required by 18 U.S.C. § 2257 to be
maintained with respect to any performer in such production is not
eligible for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits; and
[(6) The requirements for notice pursuant to NRS 360.7595;]
(4) Any necessary provisions to ensure compliance with the
requirements of paragraph (d) of subsection 3 relating to
workforce plans; and
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to [carry
out] ensure that the provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598,
inclusive [.] , are carried out in a manner that is reasonable and
customary within the industry for the production of qualified
productions.
9. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits will be administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to carry
out the functions performed by each entity pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 47 –
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Traditionally underrepresented group” means:
(1) Women;
(2) A racial or ethnic minority group;
(3) A group of persons who identify as LGBTQ, which
means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, intersex or any
other nonheterosexual or noncisgender orientation or gender
identity or expression;
(4) A group of persons with disabilities, as defined in 6
NRS 426.068;
(5) Veterans;
(6) Persons who are currently serving on active duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States; or
(7) Persons who were previously incarcerated in a jail or
prison.
(b) “Veteran” means a person who has served in the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
National Guard and was separated from such service under
conditions other than dishonorable.
Sec. 27. NRS 360.7591 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7591 1. [Qualified] Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection and subsection 3, qualified direct production
expenditures that may serve as a basis for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits issued pursuant to NRS 360.759 must [be
for purchases,] :
(a) Be expenditures made during the period in which a
qualified production is produced;
(b) Be customary and reasonable;
(c) Relate to a category of qualified expenditures and costs
listed in subsection 2; and
(d) Be:
(1) Purchases, rentals or leases of tangible personal property
or services from a Nevada business . [during the period in which a
qualified production is produced, must be customary and reasonable
and]
(2) The payroll, including wages, salaries and fringe
benefits, for Nevada residents or other personnel for labor or
services provided in this State, as included in the calculation of the
amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits in
accordance with subsection 4. The payroll, including wages,
salaries and fringe benefits, for Nevada residents or other
personnel for labor or services provided outside this State must not
be a qualified direct production expenditure.
(3) Compensation, including wages, salaries, fringe
benefits and other payments, paid to a bona fide third-party
-
*AB5_R2*

– 48 –
service provider, or to another person receiving the compensation
on behalf of the bona fide third-party service provider, for labor or
services provided in Nevada. Compensation, including wages,
salaries, fringe benefits and other payments, paid to a bona fide
third-party service provider, or to another person receiving the
compensation on behalf of the bona fide third-party service
provider, for labor or services provided outside Nevada must not
be a qualified direct production expenditure.
2. Expenditures or costs that may serve as a basis for
calculating noninfrastructure transferable tax credits must relate
to:
(a) Set construction and operation;
(b) Wardrobe and makeup;
(c) Photography, sound and lighting;
(d) Filming, film processing and film editing;
(e) The rental or leasing of facilities, equipment and vehicles;
(f) Food and lodging;
(g) Editing, sound mixing, special effects, visual effects and
other postproduction services;
(h) [The payroll for Nevada residents or other personnel who
provided services in this State;
(i)] Payment for goods or services provided by a Nevada
business;
[(j)] (i) The design, construction, improvement or repair of
property, infrastructure, equipment or a production or
postproduction facility;
[(k)] (j) State and local government taxes to the extent not
included as part of another cost reported pursuant to this section;
[(l) Fees paid to a producer who is a Nevada resident; and
(m)] or
(k) Any other transaction, service or activity authorized in
regulations adopted by the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to NRS 360.759.
[2.] 3. Expenditures and costs:
(a) Related to:
(1) The acquisition, transfer or use of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits;
(2) Marketing and distribution;
(3) Financing, depreciation and amortization;
(4) The payment of any profits as a result of the qualified
production;
(5) The payment for the cost of the audit required by NRS
360.759; and
(6) The payment for any goods or services that are not
directly attributable to the qualified production;
-
*AB5_R2*

– 49 –
(b) For which reimbursement is received, or for which
reimbursement is reasonably expected to be received;
(c) Which are paid to a joint venturer or a parent, subsidiary or
other affiliate of the production company, unless the amount paid
represents the fair market value , which may be represented by a
rate sheet, of the purchase, rental or lease of the property or services
for which payment is made; or
(d) [Which provide a pass-through benefit to a person who is not
a Nevada resident; or
(e)] Which have been previously claimed as a basis for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits [,] issued pursuant to
NRS 360.759 or film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to section 11 of this act,
 are not qualified direct production expenditures and are not
eligible to serve as a basis for transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to NRS 360.759.
[3.] 4. If any tangible personal property is acquired by a
Nevada business from a vendor outside this State for immediate
resale, rental or lease to a production company that produces a
qualified production, expenditures incurred by the production
company for the purchase, rental or lease of the property are
qualified direct production expenditures only if:
(a) The Nevada business regularly deals in property of that kind;
(b) The expenditures are otherwise qualified direct production
expenditures under the provisions of this section; and
(c) Not more than 50 percent of the property purchased, rented
or leased by the production company for the qualified production is
acquired and purchased, rented or leased in the manner described in
this subsection. In making the calculation required by this
paragraph, the cost of any property that remains an asset of the
Nevada business after production of the qualified production has
ended must not be included in the calculation as property purchased,
rented or leased in the manner described in this subsection.
[4.] 5. If any tangible personal property is acquired by the
production company as an asset, the calculation of the costs of the
tangible personal property that constitute a qualified direct
production expenditure must be performed in the manner prescribed
by the Office [of Economic Development] by regulation.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Bona fide third-party service provider” means a qualified
entity, a qualified individual or any other person determined by
the Office to be providing necessary and appropriate labor or
services directly related to the qualified production.
(b) “Fringe benefits” means employee expenses paid by an
employer for the use of the employee’s services, including, without
-
*AB5_R2*

– 50 –
limitation, payments made to a governmental entity, union dues,
health insurance premiums, payments to a pension plan and
payments for workers’ compensation insurance.
(c) “Qualified entity” means an entity that is:
(1) A personal service corporation, as defined in 26 U.S.C.
§ 269A(b)(1), a payroll services corporation or any entity receiving
payments for services performed in this State by a qualified
individual; and
(2) Registered to conduct business pursuant to the laws of
this State.
(d) “Qualified individual” means any natural person who
performs services during the production period in an activity
related to the production of a qualified production. The term does
not include:
(1) Any natural person related to the production company
or an employee of the production company, as described in
subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of 26 U.S.C. § 51(i)(1).
(2) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
416(i)(1)(B), of the production company.
Sec. 28. NRS 360.7592 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7592 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 4]
subsections 3 and 5 and NRS 360.7593 and 360.7594, the base
amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to an
eligible production company pursuant to NRS 360.759 :
(a) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2029, or
on or after July 1, 2044, must equal 15 percent of the qualified
direct production expenditures.
(b) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits on or after July 1, 2029,
and before July 1, 2044, must equal 30 percent of the qualified
direct production expenditures.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections [3] 4 and [4] 5
and NRS 360.7594, if an eligible production company submitted
the application for the certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS
360.759 before July 1, 2029, or on or after July 1, 2044, in addition
to the base amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued
to [an] the eligible production company [pursuant to NRS 360.759]
must include credits in an amount equal to [:
-
*AB5_R2*

– 51 –
(a) An additional 5 percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures if more than 50 percent of the below-the-line personnel
of the qualified production are Nevada residents; and
(b) An] an additional 5 percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures if more than 50 percent of the filming days of the
qualified production occurred in a county in this State in which, in
each of the 2 years immediately preceding the date of application,
qualified productions incurred less than $10,000,000 of qualified
direct production expenditures.
3. [For the purposes of paragraph (a) of subsection 2:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are
Nevada residents must be determined by dividing the number of
workdays worked by Nevada residents by the number of workdays
worked by all below-the-line personnel.
(b) Any work performed by an extra must not be considered in
determining the percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are
Nevada residents.
4. The] Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5
and NRS 360.7594, if an eligible production company submitted
the application for the certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS
360.759 on or after the date on which the Office adopts the
regulations required by section 11 of this act and before July 1,
2044, the Office shall not issue any noninfrastructure transferable
tax credits to the production company for the qualified production
if the final assessment of the workforce plan submitted by the
production company for the qualified production pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 3 of NRS 360.759 does not include
documentation that the diversity goals set forth in subparagraph
(2) of paragraph (d) of subsection 3 of NRS 360.759 were met.
4. The Executive Director of the Office shall waive a
reduction in the cumulative amount of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits required pursuant to subsection 3 upon
written proof to the Executive Director that the production
company made a good faith effort to meet the requirements of that
subsection and there is an insufficient number of persons
available and qualified to meet the requirements.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the
Executive Director of the Office may:
(a) Reduce the cumulative amount of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits that are calculated pursuant to this section by
an amount equal to any damages incurred by the State or any
political subdivision of the State as a result of a qualified production
that is produced in this State; or
-
*AB5_R2*

– 52 –
(b) Withhold the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits, in
whole or in part:
(1) Until any pending legal action in this State against a
production company or involving a qualified production is resolved.
(2) If a production company violates any state or local law.
(3) If a production company is found to have knowingly
submitted any false statement, representation or certification in any
document submitted for the purpose of obtaining noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits.
6. Before taking any action authorized by subsection 5, the
Executive Director of the Office shall:
(a) Consider any documentation submitted by the production
company related to the action under consideration; and
(b) Make the following determinations:
(1) That good cause exists to take such action;
(2) That the action is reasonable based on the
circumstances of the underlying incident on which the reduction
or withholding of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
authorized pursuant to subsection 5 is based; and
(3) The amount of any reduction or withholding of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits authorized pursuant to
subsection 5 is commensurate with severity of the underlying
incident on which the reduction or withholding is based.
Sec. 29. NRS 360.7593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7593 1. [In] For an eligible production company that
submitted the application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2029, or
on or after July 1, 2044, in calculating the base amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection 1
of NRS 360.7592:
(a) Wages and salaries, including fringe benefits, paid to above-
the-line personnel who are not Nevada residents must be included in
the calculation at a rate of 12 percent.
(b) Wages and salaries, including fringe benefits, paid to below-
the-line personnel who are not Nevada residents [:
(1) For the period beginning January 1, 2014, and ending
December 31, 2014, must be included in the calculation at a rate of
12 percent.
(2) For the period beginning January 1, 2015, and ending
December 31, 2015, must be included in the calculation at a rate of
10 percent.
(3) For the period beginning January 1, 2016, and ending
December 31, 2016, must be included in the calculation at a rate of
8 percent.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 53 –
(4) For the period beginning January 1, 2017,] must not be
included in the calculation.
2. As used in this section, “fringe benefits” means employee
expenses paid by an employer for the use of a person’s services,
including, without limitation, payments made to a governmental
entity, union dues, health insurance premiums, payments to a
pension plan and payments for workers’ compensation insurance.
Sec. 30. NRS 360.7594 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7594 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the Office [of Economic Development] shall not approve any
application for a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits submitted pursuant to NRS 360.759 if
approval of the application would cause the total amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits approved pursuant to
NRS 360.759 for each [fiscal] :
(a) Fiscal year commencing before July 1, 2029, or on or after
July 1, 2044, to exceed the sum of $10,000,000. [Any] Except as
otherwise provided in this paragraph, any portion of the
$10,000,000 per fiscal year for which noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits have not previously been approved by the
Office under an application for a certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits submitted pursuant to
NRS 360.759 may be carried forward and made available for
approval during the next or any future fiscal year.
Noninfrastructure transferable tax credits that are available for
approval for a fiscal year commencing before July 1, 2029, but
have not been approved for a fiscal year commencing before
July 1, 2029, must not be carried forward and made available for
approval during any fiscal year commencing on or after July 1,
2029.
(b) Fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2029, and
before July 1, 2044, to exceed the sum of $25,000,000. An amount
not to exceed 50 percent of the $25,000,000 per fiscal year for
which noninfrastructure transferable tax credits have not
previously been approved by the Office under an application for a
certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits submitted pursuant to NRS 360.759 may be carried
forward and made available for approval during the next or any
future fiscal year.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the
Office approves an application for a certificate of eligibility
pursuant to NRS 360.759, the Office shall assign the amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits identified under the
certificate of eligibility to the fiscal year in which the application
for the certificate of eligibility is approved.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 54 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, an amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office
under a certificate of eligibility issued to a production company
pursuant to NRS 360.759 that exceeds the amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the Office
under a certificate of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
issued to the production company pursuant to NRS 360.759 may
be added to the amount made available for approval during
subsequent fiscal years.
4. For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2029, or
on or after July 1, 2044, the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits issued to any production company for any qualified
production pursuant to NRS 360.759:
(a) Must not exceed a total amount of $6,000,000; and
(b) Expire [4] at the end of the calendar year that is 6 years
after the date on which the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits are issued to the production company.
[3.] 5. For [the purposes of calculating qualified direct
production expenditures:
(a) The compensation payable to all producers who are Nevada
residents must not exceed 10 percent of the portion of the total
budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(b) The compensation payable to all producers who are not
Nevada residents must not exceed 5 percent of the portion of the
total budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(c) The compensation payable to any employee, independent
contractor or any other person paid a wage or salary as
compensation for providing labor services on the production of the
qualified production must not exceed $750,000.] an eligible
production company that submitted the application for the
certificate of eligibility for the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits on or after July 1, 2029, and before July 1, 2044, the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to the production
company for a qualified production pursuant to NRS 360.759:
(a) Must not exceed a total of $7,000,000; and
(b) Expire at the end of the calendar year that is 6 years after
the date on which the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
are issued to the production company.
Sec. 31. NRS 360.7595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7595 1. [If the Office of Economic Development
receives an application for transferable tax credits pursuant to
-
*AB5_R2*

– 55 –
NRS 360.759, the Office shall, not later than 10 days before a
hearing on the application, provide notice of the hearing to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
2. The notice required by this section must set forth the date,
time and location of the hearing on the application. The date of the
hearing must be not later than 60 days after the Office receives the
completed application.
3. The Office shall issue a decision on the application not later
than 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing on the application.
4.] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if [the] an
application for a certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits is approved [,] pursuant to NRS 360.759,
principal photography of the qualified production must begin not
more than 90 days after the date on which the decision on the
application is issued. The Office : [of Economic Development:]
(a) Shall prescribe by regulation the procedure for determining
the date of commencement of qualified productions that do not
include photography for the purposes of this section.
(b) May extend by not more than 90 days the period otherwise
prescribed by this subsection [.] , except that in the case of a force
majeure, the Office may extend the period for more than 90 days.
[5.] 2. A production company that produces a qualified
production shall submit the final assessment of the workforce plan,
the audit required by NRS 360.759 and all other required
information to the Office and the Department within the time
required by paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection 3 of NRS 360.759 [.] ,
as applicable. Production of the qualified production must be
completed within 18 months after the date of commencement of
principal photography [.] , except that the Office may extend this
period for completion of the qualified production by not more than
6 months. If the Office or the Department determines that
information submitted pursuant to this subsection is incomplete, the
production company shall, not later than 30 days after receiving
notice that the information is incomplete, provide to the Office or
the Department, as applicable, all additional information required by
the Office or the Department.
[6.] 3. The Office shall give priority to the approval and
processing of an application relating to a qualified production that
promotes tourism in the State of Nevada.
Sec. 32. NRS 360.7598 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7598 The Office of Economic Development shall, on or
before [October] December 1 of each even-numbered year, prepare
and submit to the Governor and to the Director of the Legislative
-
*AB5_R2*

– 56 –
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature [an annual] a
report which includes, for the immediately preceding fiscal year [:]
and cumulatively for the period beginning on the effective date of
this act and ending on the last day of the immediately preceding
fiscal year:
1. The number of applications submitted for a certificate of
eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to
NRS 360.759;
2. The number of qualified productions for which
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits were approved;
3. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
approved;
4. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
used;
5. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred;
6. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
taken against each allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount
used and outstanding, in total and for each qualified production;
7. The [total] aggregate amount of the qualified direct
production expenditures incurred by [each] qualified [production]
productions and the portion of those expenditures that were incurred
in Nevada;
8. The aggregate number of persons in Nevada employed by
[each] qualified [production and] productions, the aggregate
amount of wages paid to those persons [;] and aggregated
demographic information concerning those persons; [and]
9. The number of persons employed by each qualified
production who were paid compensation of more than $1,000,000
for labor or services provided for the qualified production and the
total number of persons employed by each qualified production
who were paid more than $1,000,000 for labor or services provided
for the qualified production;
10. For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of below-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who
were Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the number of
workdays worked by Nevada residents who were below-the-line
personnel, excluding background actors, by the number of
workdays worked by all below-the-line personnel, excluding
background actors;
11. For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of below-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who
were Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the wages and
-
*AB5_R2*

– 57 –
salaries paid to Nevada residents who were below-the-line
personnel, excluding background actors, for labor or services
provided in this State by the total wages and salaries paid to all
below-the-line personnel, excluding background actors;
12. For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of above-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who
were Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the number of
workdays worked by Nevada residents who were above-the-line
personnel by the number of workdays worked by all above-the-line
personnel;
13. For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of above-the-line personnel,
by occupation and in aggregate, providing labor or services who
were Nevada residents, calculated by dividing the wages and
salaries paid to Nevada residents who were above-the-line
personnel for labor or services provided in this State by the total
wages and salaries paid to all above-the-line personnel;
14. For each qualified production and cumulatively for all
qualified productions, the percentage of total compensation paid
to above-the-line personnel, by occupation and in aggregate, and
the percentage of total compensation paid to below-the-line
personnel, by occupation and in aggregate; and
15. The period during which each qualified production was in
Nevada and employed persons in Nevada.
Sec. 33. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 34 to 40, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 34. As used in sections 34 to 40, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 35, 36 and 37 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 35. “Account” means the Account for Nevada Film,
Media and Related Technology Education and Vocational
Training created by section 38 of this act.
Sec. 36. “Board” means the Board for Nevada Film, Media
and Related Technology Education and Vocational Training
created by section 39 of this act.
Sec. 37. “Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 7 of this act.
Sec. 38. 1. The Account for Nevada Film, Media and
Related Technology Education and Vocational Training is hereby
created in the State General Fund. The Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development, at the direction of the Board,
shall administer the Account.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 58 –
2. The Executive Director may apply for and accept gifts,
grants, bequests and donations from any source for deposit in the
Account.
3. The Account consists of:
(a) Money transferred to the Account pursuant to NRS
360.759 and section 11 of this act.
(b) Any direct legislative appropriations to the Account.
(c) Any gifts, grants, bequests and donations made to the
Account.
(d) Interest and income earned on money in the Account.
4. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account.
5. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of the
fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
6. Money in the Account must be used by the Office to make
grants to any institution within the Nevada System of Higher
Education, a state or local agency, a school district, a charter
school, a vocational trade school, a nonprofit organization, a labor
organization or a private postsecondary educational institution
that provides a program of workforce development for the
production of qualified productions in this State. Thirty percent of
the money which is distributed from the Account in the form of
grants must be allocated to the Nevada Partners Vocational
Training Studio for the operation and overhead costs of the
Nevada Partners Vocational Training Studio. Seventy percent of
the money which is distributed from the Account in the form of
grants must be allocated to educational and vocational training
organizations pursuant to section 40 of this act for the purpose of
providing programs of workforce development for the production
of qualified productions in this State.
7. As used in this section, “qualified production” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 360.7586.
Sec. 39. 1. There is hereby created the Board for Nevada
Film, Media and Related Technology Education and Vocational
Training within the Office of Economic Development in the Office
of the Governor, consisting of the following voting members:
(a) One member appointed by the Governor;
(b) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Majority Leader of the Senate;
(c) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Speaker of the Assembly;
-
*AB5_R2*

– 59 –
(d) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Senate;
(e) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Assembly;
(f) Two members appointed by the Governor from nominees
selected by the lead participant in the Summerlin Production
Studios Project;
(g) One member appointed by the Governor from a nominee
selected by the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board to
represent the interests of the Nevada Partners Vocational Training
Studio;
(h) One member appointed by the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada;
(i) The President of the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, or
his or her designee; and
(j) The President of the University of Nevada, Reno, or his or
her designee.
2. In appointing members to the Board pursuant to
subsection 1, the appointing authorities set forth in that subsection
shall coordinate to ensure that both the public and private sectors
are represented on the Board.
3. The members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (a), (c),
(e) and (g) of subsection 1, and one member appointed pursuant to
paragraph (f) of subsection 1, must be appointed to an initial term
of 2 years commencing on January 1, 2028, and the members
appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b), (d) and (h) of subsection 1,
and one member appointed pursuant to paragraph (f) of
subsection 1, must be appointed to an initial term of 4 years
commencing on January 1, 2028. After the initial terms, each
appointed member shall serve a term of 4 years. Each appointed
member serves at the pleasure of the person appointing that
member pursuant to subsection 1. If, for any reason, a vacancy
occurs during the term of an appointed member, the person who is
responsible for making the appointment pursuant to subsection 1
shall appoint a replacement qualified pursuant to that subsection
to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. Each appointed
member may serve not more than three consecutive full terms.
4. At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the Board shall
elect from among its members a Chair and a Vice Chair. The
Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development shall
serve as the nonvoting Secretary of the Board.
5. A majority of the voting members of the Board constitutes
a quorum, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting
members of the Board is required to exercise any power conferred
on the Board.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 60 –
6. The Board shall meet at least twice each calendar year but
may meet more often at the call of the Chair or a majority of the
voting members of the Board.
7. The members of the Board serve without compensation but
are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally while engaged
in the official business of the Board.
8. A member of the Board who is an officer or employee of
this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from duties without loss of regular compensation so that the
officer or employee may prepare for and attend meetings of the
Board and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties of
the Board in the most timely manner practicable. A state agency or
political subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or
employee who is a member of the Board to make up the time the
officer or employee is absent from work to carry out duties as a
member of the Board or use annual vacation or compensatory
time for the absence.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board” means
the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board created by
section 8 of the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community
Infrastructure Improvement Act.
(b) “Summerlin Production Studios Project” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 40. 1. The Board shall establish:
(a) The procedures for a person or entity to apply for a grant
of money from the Account;
(b) The criteria to be used to determine whether to approve an
application for a grant from the Account to an applicant; and
(c) The requirements for reports by recipients of grants from
the Account concerning the expenditures made from the grant, the
outcomes of the programs supported by the grant, demographic
data concerning the participants in the programs supported by the
grant and any other information deemed necessary by the Board.
The Board shall provide to the Office a compilation of the
information provided in reports made by recipients pursuant to
this paragraph.
2. The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development may provide advice and recommendations regarding
the procedures, criteria and requirements established by the Board
pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Office shall not make a grant of money from the
Account unless the Board has approved the application for the
grant.
-
*AB5_R2*

– 61 –
Sec. 41. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 42. As soon as practicable after entering into a
development agreement that satisfies the requirements of section 10
of this act with the lead participant of the Summerlin Production
Studios Project described in section 9 of this act, the Executive
Director of the Office of Economic Development shall notify the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau of that
fact.
Sec. 43. The Office of Economic Development, the Nevada
Gaming Commission and the Nevada Tax Commission shall each
adopt such regulations as are respectively required to implement the
provisions of this act on or before December 31, 2026.
Sec. 44. The amendatory provisions of sections 21 to 33,
inclusive, of this act do not apply to any qualified production for
which an application for a certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits is approved pursuant to
NRS 360.759 before January 1, 2027.
Sec. 45. The Legislative Counsel shall:
1. In preparing the Nevada Revised Statutes, use the authority
set forth in subsection 10 of NRS 220.120 to substitute
appropriately the term “noninfrastructure transferable tax credits” in
NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive, for the term “transferable tax
credits” as previously used in those sections.
2. In preparing supplements to the Nevada Administrative
Code, substitute appropriately the term “noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits” in NAC 360.800 to 360.865, inclusive, for
the term “transferable tax credits” as previously used in those
sections.
Sec. 46. If any provision of this act, or the application thereof
to any person, thing or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity
shall not affect the provisions or application of this act which can be
given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this
end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
Sec. 47. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 48. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 20, inclusive, and 33 to 47, inclusive, of this
act become effective:
-
*AB5_R2*

– 62 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks. For the purposes of this paragraph, “preparatory
administrative tasks” include, without limitation, the negotiation,
preparation and execution of a development agreement that satisfies
the requirements set forth in section 10 of this act and notifying the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau that
the Office of Economic Development has entered into such an
agreement.
(b) For all other purposes, on the date on which the Executive
Director of the Office of Economic Development notifies the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
pursuant to section 42 of this act that the Office has entered into a
development agreement that satisfies the requirements of section 10
of this act with the lead participant of the Project described in
section 9 of this act.
3. Sections 21 to 32, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks.
(b) For all other purposes, on January 1, 2027, if and only if the
Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development notifies
the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
that the Office has entered into a development agreement that
satisfies the requirements of section 10 of this act with the lead
participant of the Project described in section 9 of this act.
4. If sections 1 to 17, inclusive, and sections 19 to 46,
inclusive, of this act become effective pursuant to this section, those
sections expire by limitation on June 30, 2050.
H
-
*AB5_R2*